Nebraska, session 109, LB635.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 81-8,129, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,129 The State Athletic Commissioner shall have sole direction,
management, control, and jurisdiction over all professional mixed martial arts,
professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts, professional mixed martial arts
on ice, professional muay thai, professional boxing, professional kickboxing,
professional bare-knuckle boxing, and professional sparring matches and
exhibitions and all amateur mixed martial arts, amateur muay thai, and amateur
kickboxing matches and exhibitions to be held within the state, except such as
are conducted by universities, colleges, high schools, the military, and
recognized amateur associations for contestants under sixteen years of age. No
professional boxers, professional mixed martial arts contestants, professional
bare-knuckle mixed martial arts contestants, professional mixed martial arts on
ice contestants, professional muay thai contestants, professional kickboxers,
professional bare-knuckle boxers, or amateur mixed martial arts contestants,
amateur muay thai contestants, or amateur kickboxing contestants who have
attained the age of sixteen, shall participate in a match or exhibition for a
prize or purse, or at which an admission fee is charged, either directly or
indirectly, in the form of dues or otherwise, in this state except by a club,
association, organization, or person licensed by the commissioner, as provided
in section 81-8,130, and in pursuance of a license granted by the commissioner
for such match or exhibition under section 81-8,130.01.
Sec. 2. Section 81-8,130, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,130 The State Athletic Commissioner may issue an annual license for
conducting amateur mixed martial arts, amateur muay thai, or amateur kickboxing
matches or exhibitions to any club, association, or organization. Each
application for a license shall be accompanied by a fee set by the commissioner
in rule and regulation. Such fee shall be not less than twenty-five dollars and
not more than one hundred dollars.
Sec. 3. Section 81-8,130.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,130.01 Licenses and permits may be issued to professional mixed
martial arts, professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts, professional mixed
martial arts on ice, professional muay thai, professional boxing, professional
kickboxing, or professional bare-knuckle boxing promoters, whether persons,
clubs, or associations, for the sole purpose of conducting professional matches
under such rules and regulations as the State Athletic Commissioner shall
adopt. Each application for such license shall be accompanied by a fee set by
the commissioner in rule and regulation. Such fee shall be not less than one
hundred dollars and not more than three hundred dollars. If the promoter is an
individual, the application shall include his or her social security number.
Sec. 4. Section 81-8,132, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,132 No license shall be granted unless the licensee has executed a
bond in the sum of not less than one thousand dollars in the case of amateur
mixed martial arts, amateur muay thai, or amateur kickboxing nor less than five
thousand dollars in the case of professional mixed martial arts, professional
bare-knuckle mixed martial arts, professional mixed martial arts on ice,
professional muay thai, professional boxing, professional kickboxing, or
professional bare-knuckle boxing. The license shall be approved by the State
Athletic Commissioner, conditioned on the faithful compliance by the licensee
with the provisions of sections 81-8,129 to 81-8,142.01, the rules and
regulations of the commissioner, and such other laws of the state as may be
applicable to anything done by the licensee in pursuance of the license.
Sec. 5. Section 81-8,133, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,133 The State Athletic Commissioner is authorized to grant licenses
to competent referees, upon an application and the payment of a fee set by the
commissioner in rule and regulation. Such fee shall be not less than ten
dollars and not more than forty dollars per annum. The commissioner may revoke
any license so granted for such cause as may be deemed sufficient. At every
professional boxing, professional mixed martial arts, professional bare-knuckle
mixed martial arts, professional mixed martial arts on ice, professional muay
-1-

LB635 LB635
2025 2025
thai, professional kickboxing, professional bare-knuckle boxing, amateur mixed
martial arts, amateur muay thai, amateur kickboxing, or professional sparring
match or exhibition, there shall be in attendance a duly licensed referee, who
shall direct and control the match. The referee shall stop the match whenever
he or she deems it advisable, (1) because of the physical condition of the
contestants or one of them, (2) when one of the contestants is clearly
outclassed by his or her opponent, or (3) for any other sufficient reason. The
referee shall, at the termination of every professional boxing, professional
mixed martial arts, professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts, professional
mixed martial arts on ice, professional muay thai, professional kickboxing,
professional bare-knuckle boxing, amateur mixed martial arts, amateur muay
thai, amateur kickboxing, or professional sparring match or exhibition,
indicate a winner. The fees of the referee and other licensed officials may be
fixed by the commissioner and shall be paid by the licensed organization.
Sec. 6. Section 81-8,133.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,133.01 The State Athletic Commissioner may grant licenses to
qualified physicians, managers, matchmakers, and professional mixed martial
arts, professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts, professional mixed martial
arts on ice, professional muay thai, professional boxing, professional
kickboxing, professional bare-knuckle boxing, or professional sparring match or
exhibition judges upon an application and payment of an annual fee set by the
commissioner in rule and regulation. Such fee for matchmakers shall be not less
than ten dollars and not more than one hundred dollars. Such fee for
physicians, managers, and professional mixed martial arts, professional bare-
knuckle mixed martial arts, professional mixed martial arts on ice,
professional muay thai, professional boxing, professional kickboxing,
professional bare-knuckle boxing, or professional sparring match or exhibition
judges shall be not less than ten dollars and not more than twenty dollars. The
commissioner may also grant licenses to qualified timekeepers, contestants, and
seconds upon an application and payment of an annual fee set by the
commissioner in rule and regulation. Such fee shall be not less than ten
dollars and not more than twenty dollars. The application shall include the
applicant's social security number. No person shall serve as physician,
manager, matchmaker, or judge at any professional mixed martial arts,
professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts, professional mixed martial arts
on ice, professional muay thai, professional boxing, professional kickboxing,
professional bare-knuckle boxing, or professional sparring match or exhibition
who is not licensed as such. No person shall serve as timekeeper or contestant
at any professional mixed martial arts, professional bare-knuckle mixed martial
arts, professional mixed martial arts on ice, professional muay thai,
professional boxing, professional kickboxing, or professional bare-knuckle
boxing match who is not licensed as such. The commissioner shall have summary
authority to stop any match at which any person is serving in violation of the
provisions of this section. Any license granted under the provisions of this
section may be revoked for cause.
Sec. 7. Section 81-8,134, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,134 (1) Any professional boxing match, professional mixed martial
arts match, professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts match, professional
mixed martial arts on ice match, professional muay thai match, professional
kickboxing match, professional bare-knuckle boxing match, or amateur mixed
martial arts match, amateur muay thai match, or amateur kickboxing match
conducted in this state which is labeled or promoted as a championship match
shall have regional or national significance and the approval of a nationally
recognized professional boxing, mixed martial arts, bare-knuckle mixed martial
arts, mixed martial arts on ice, muay thai, kickboxing, or bare-knuckle boxing
association.
(2) Professional boxing, professional kickboxing, professional bare-
knuckle boxing, or professional sparring matches or exhibitions shall not
exceed ten rounds in length, except in a championship match, which shall not
exceed fifteen rounds. No round shall be longer than three minutes. At least
one minute shall intervene between rounds. Except for professional bare-knuckle
mixed martial arts, professional kickboxing, or professional bare-knuckle
boxing matches, the contestants shall wear during the contest gloves weighing
at least eight ounces each.
(3) Professional mixed martial arts, professional muay thai, and
professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts matches or exhibitions shall not
exceed three rounds in length, except in a championship match, which shall not
exceed five rounds in length. No round shall be longer than five minutes. At
least one minute shall intervene between rounds.
(4) No professional boxing contestant, professional mixed martial arts
contestant, professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts contestant,
professional mixed martial arts on ice contestant, professional muay thai
contestant, professional kickboxing contestant, professional bare-knuckle
boxing contestant, or amateur mixed martial arts contestant, amateur muay thai
contestant, or amateur kickboxing contestant shall be allowed to participate or
take part in any contest in this state unless a duly licensed physician shall
certify in writing that such contestant has taken a physical examination the
day of the contest and is physically fit to engage in the proposed contest.
Sec. 8. Section 81-8,135, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,135 Every licensee conducting or holding any professional mixed
-2-

LB635 LB635
2025 2025
martial arts, professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts, professional mixed
martial arts on ice, professional muay thai, amateur mixed martial arts,
amateur muay thai, amateur kickboxing, professional boxing, professional
kickboxing, or professional bare-knuckle boxing match shall furnish to the
State Athletic Commissioner a written report showing the articles of agreement
between the contestants, the number of tickets sold for each contest, the
amount of the gross receipts thereof, the gross receipts from sale of any
television rights, and such other matters as the commissioner shall prescribe.
Within such time the licensee shall pay to the commissioner a tax of five
percent of the total gross receipts of any professional mixed martial arts,
professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts, professional mixed martial arts
on ice, professional muay thai, professional boxing, professional kickboxing,
or professional bare-knuckle boxing match or exhibition, exclusive of state and
federal taxes, except the gross receipts from sale of television rights, and
five percent of such rights, and five percent of the total gross receipts of
any amateur mixed martial arts, amateur muay thai, or amateur kickboxing match
or exhibition, exclusive of state and federal taxes, except that if such match
or exhibition is conducted as an incidental feature in any event or
entertainment of a different character, such portion of the total receipts
shall be paid to the state as the commissioner may determine, or as may be
fixed by rule adopted under section 81-8,139.
Sec. 9. Section 81-8,138, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,138 No contestant in any match or exhibition shall be paid for
services until the same are rendered, and should it be determined by the State
Athletic Commissioner that a contestant did not give an honest exhibition of
his or her skill, he or she shall not be paid. Any contestant who shall
participate in any sham or fake professional boxing, professional mixed martial
arts, professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts, professional mixed martial
arts on ice, professional muay thai, professional kickboxing, professional
bare-knuckle boxing, or amateur mixed martial arts, amateur muay thai, or
amateur kickboxing match or exhibition shall be disqualified and shall not
thereafter be permitted to contend in any match or exhibition in this state,
and any contestant who shall participate in any sham or fake professional
boxing, professional mixed martial arts, professional bare-knuckle mixed
martial arts, professional mixed martial arts on ice, professional muay thai,
professional kickboxing, professional bare-knuckle boxing, or amateur mixed
martial arts, amateur muay thai, or amateur kickboxing match or exhibition
shall be guilty of a violation of sections 81-8,128 to 81-8,142.01.
Sec. 10. Section 81-8,139, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,139 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
State Athletic Commissioner shall adopt and promulgate such rules and
regulations for the administration and enforcement of sections 81-8,128 to
81-8,142.01 as he or she may deem necessary. Such rules and regulations shall
include, but not be limited to, the establishment of written criteria for the
granting and revoking of licenses, the setting of license fees, and the
qualification requirements for those to be licensed as referees, physicians,
managers, matchmakers, and professional boxing, professional mixed martial
arts, professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts, professional mixed martial
arts on ice, professional muay thai, professional kickboxing, professional
bare-knuckle boxing, or professional sparring match or exhibition judges. He or
she shall have the power and may control and limit the number of professional
mixed martial arts, professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts, professional
mixed martial arts on ice, professional muay thai, amateur mixed martial arts,
amateur muay thai, amateur kickboxing, professional boxing, professional
kickboxing, professional bare-knuckle boxing, or professional sparring matches
or exhibitions given, or to be held, each year, or within one week, in any city
or town, or by any organization. He or she may fine any licensee, except
amateur contestants, an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars and may
suspend for a period, not to exceed one year, any licensee's right to
participate in or conduct any match or exhibition for unsportsmanlike conduct
while engaged in or arising directly from any match or exhibition, failure to
compete in good faith, engaging in any sham match or exhibition, or the use of
threatening and abusive language toward officials, other contestants, or
spectators.
(2) The State Athletic Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to identify a list of substances banned for use by any amateur or
professional contestant and may require any contestant to submit to a test for
banned substances as a condition for allowing the contestant's participation in
a match or exhibition.
(3) The State Athletic Commissioner may suspend an amateur or professional
contestant from competition for a period not to exceed one year and may fine a
professional contestant an amount not to exceed one thousand five hundred
dollars or forty percent of the prize or purse, whichever is greater, for a
first offense of failing a test for a banned substance on the list developed
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section or for refusing to submit to such a
test. He or she may suspend an amateur or professional contestant from
competition for a period not to exceed three years and may fine a professional
contestant an amount not to exceed three thousand dollars or seventy percent of
the prize or purse, whichever is greater, for any second such offense. He or
she may suspend an amateur or professional contestant from competition for life
and may fine a professional contestant an amount not to exceed five thousand
-3-

LB635 LB635
2025 2025
dollars or one hundred percent of the prize or purse, whichever is greater, for
any third or subsequent such offense. For purposes of determining if an offense
under this subsection is a first, second, third, or subsequent offense, failing
a test for banned substances and refusing to submit to such a test shall be
considered the same offense.
(4) Before levying an administrative fine pursuant to this section, the
State Athletic Commissioner shall set the matter for hearing. Proceedings to
levy an administrative fine shall be contested cases prosecuted and appealable
pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act. At least ten days before the
hearing, the State Athletic Commissioner shall serve notice of the time, date,
and place of the hearing upon the licensee or other violator by personal or
certified mail service.
(5) The State Athletic Commissioner shall remit any administrative fines
collected under this section to the State Treasurer for distribution in
accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 11. Original sections 81-8,129, 81-8,130, 81-8,130.01, 81-8,132,
81-8,133, 81-8,133.01, 81-8,134, 81-8,135, 81-8,138, and 81-8,139, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-4-